Missouri, session 2026, HB1687.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 566, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 566.450, to read as follows:
566.450. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon conviction of any
sexual offense requiring registration under sections 589.400 to 589.425 that is also an
aggravated sexual offense as defined under 566.010, except sexual abuse in the first
degree under section 566.100 and sexual abuse in the second degree under section
566.101, occurring on or after August 28, 2026, if the victim of the offense is under
thirteen years of age at the time of the offense, in addition to any other sentence imposed
for the offense, the court may sentence the offender to be surgically castrated. Such
surgical procedure shall be administered by the department of corrections by a licensed
physician. The department shall provide the services necessary to perform the
castration.
2. (1) An order of the court sentencing an offender to surgical castration under
this section shall be contingent upon a determination by a court-appointed medical
expert that the offender is an appropriate candidate for surgery. Notwithstanding
subdivision (2) of this subsection, such determination shall be made no later than sixty
days from the imposition of sentence.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1687 2
(2) In all cases involving an offender sentenced to a period of incarceration or
confinement in a correctional center as defined under section 217.010, the procedure
shall be performed no later than one week prior to the offender's release from the
correctional center.
(3) If an offender fails to appear as required by court order for purposes of the
procedure or refuses to allow the procedure, the offender shall be charged with a
violation of the provisions of this section. Upon conviction, the offender shall be
imprisoned for no less than three years nor more than five years without benefit of
probation, parole, or suspension of sentence.
3. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the surgical castration if it
is not medically appropriate.
4. The provisions of this section shall not apply to an offender who is under
seventeen years of age.
✔